Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2588.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 107(a) of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 107. Definitions.--(a) The following words and 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Data center," a facility, campus of facilities or interconnected array of facilities, whether under common or separate ownership or tenancy, that meets all of the following:(1) Is predominantly used to house operating servers or similar data storage systems.(2) Has an uninterruptible energy supply, generator backup power, cooling system, cooling tower or other temperature control infrastructure.(3) Has a peak electric demand of ten megawatts or greater.* * *"Hyperscale data center," a data center located on a tract or contiguous tracts of land exceeding five acres.* * *Section 2. Section 603 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 603. Ordinance Provisions.--* * *(m) A zoning ordinance may not permit a hyperscale data center as a use by right, conditional use or special exception in a zoning district in which agriculture is a permitted use unless the zoning ordinance does not permit a hyperscale data center as a use by right, conditional use or special exception in any other zoning district of the municipality.(n) A zoning ordinance may not permit a data center as a use by right, conditional use or special exception on a tract in an agricultural zoning district if at least 50% of the tract consists of any of the following:20260HB2588PN3497 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Prime agricultural land.(2) Land that contains soils of the fourth class as defined by the United States Department of Agriculture Natural Resource and Conservation Services County Soil Survey.Section 3. The addition of section 603(m) and (n) of the act shall apply to an application for development filed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2588PN3497 - 3 - 123456789